Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-2901
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-2901 to
77-2912 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act.

Laws 2014, LB191, § 1.
July 18, 2014